Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201717-157
Joint city and school district facility; expense; bonds; election; approval by electors.

The cost and expense of acquiring land for, erecting, equipping, furnishing, and maintaining a joint municipal and recreation building or joint recreational and athletic field under section 17-156 shall be borne by the school district and city of the second class in the proportion determined by the board of education of the school district and the city council. The building shall not be erected or contracted to be erected, no land shall be acquired for such buildings, and no bonds shall be issued or sold by the school district or the city of the second class until the school district and the city of the second class have each been authorized to issue bonds to defray its proportion of the cost of such land, building, equipment, and furnishings by the required number of electors of the school district and the city of the second class in the manner provided by sections 10-702 to 10-716 and 17-954. When funds and property are available for such purpose, land may be acquired, buildings erected, or equipment and furnishings supplied by a joint resolution of the school district and the city of the second class without a vote of the people.

Laws 1953, c. 37, § 2, p. 128;

Laws 1955, c. 39, § 2, p. 152;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 45.